District of Columbia statutes.
31-4431

Voting-trust agreements.

It shall be unlawful for any stockholder, director, or officer of any company having capital stock to enter into any contract or agreement, commonly known as “voting-trust agreements,” whereby the rights, benefits, or liabilities attaching to the capital stock are transferred or assigned, temporarily or otherwise, to any person or group of persons, incorporated or unincorporated, for the purpose of controlling, managing, or directing the company, or voting its stock; provided, that this section shall not prevent the granting of proxies by stockholders authorizing a designated individual to represent them at stockholders’ meetings.

June 19, 1934, 48 Stat. 1151, ch. 672, ch. III, § 31

History

1981 Ed., § 35-631.
1973 Ed., § 35-531.

Prior Codifications